Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-121
Nebraska State Historical Society; powers; delegation to subcommittees.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall have authority (1) to designate the approximate location of such markers, (2) to preserve present markers, (3) to accept gifts, and (4) to encourage local participation in and contribution to the erection of such markers through the use of gifts and matching-fund agreements. The society may appoint and delegate to a special committee the duty of research and investigation to assist in the determination of proper sites, events, personalities, and traditions to be designated.

Laws 1957, c. 384, § 3, p. 1340;

Laws 1959, c. 441, § 4, p. 1483;

R.R.S.1943, § 82-203;

Laws 1969, c. 811, § 3, p. 3049.